Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-818
Refunding bonds; terms.

The issue of refunding bonds, the manner of sale, the maturities, interest rates, form, and other details thereof, the security therefor, the rights of the holders thereof, and the rights, duties, and obligations of the joint entity in respect of the same shall be governed by the provisions of the Interlocal Cooperation Act relating to the issue of bonds other than refunding bonds insofar as the same may be applicable.

Laws 1991, LB 731, § 18.